Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-502
United States Senators; terms; qualifications; partisan ballot.

Two United States Senators shall be elected for terms of six years at the statewide general election. One senator shall be elected in 1994 and every six years thereafter, and one senator shall be elected in 1996 and every six years thereafter. Candidates for the United States Senate shall meet the qualifications found in Article I, section 3, of the Constitution of the United States. The senators shall be elected on the partisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 98.

The method of election of United States senators in Nebraska is outlined in the opinion. U.S. v. Seymour, 50 F.2d 930 (8th Cir. 1931).